Utah statutes.
51-7-7.   Securities and evidence of deposits and investments -- Custody --
Deposit for safekeeping.
(1) (a) (i)  The public treasurer shall have custody of all securities
purchased or held and all evidence of deposits and investments of public
funds.
(ii)  All securities shall be delivered versus payment to the public treasurer
or to the treasurer's safekeeping bank.
(b)  The public treasurer may deposit any of these securities with a bank or
trust company to be held in safekeeping by that custodian.
(c)  The provisions of this section do not apply to securities acquired under
a nonqualifying repurchase agreement as defined in Section 51-7-3.
(d)  The provisions of this section apply to any book-entry-only security the
ownership records of which are maintained with a securities depository, in the
Federal Book Entry system authorized by the U.S. Department of Treasury, or in
the book-entry records of the issuer, as follows:
(i)  the direct ownership of the security by the public treasurer shall be
reflected in the book-entry records and represented by a receipt,
confirmation, or statement issued to the public treasurer by the custodian of
the book-entry system; or
(ii)  the ownership of the security by the public treasurer's custodial bank
or trust company shall be reflected in the book-entry records and the public
treasurer's ownership shall be represented by a receipt, confirmation, or
statement issued by the custodial bank or trust company.
(2)  The public treasurer may maintain accounts with money center banks only
for the purposes of settling investment transactions, safekeeping, and
collecting those investments.
